src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
! ---------------
!! Võro language verbs inflect for person and number.

LEXICON V_EI
+V+Neg+Prs:i # ;
+V+Neg+Prt:s # ;
+V+Neg+Prt:siq # ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+V+Neg+Prt:si # ;

! stem and suffix correlation for Võro verbal inflection:


LEXICON V_48KASUMA !kasuma:ka%{sØ%}s
!! There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
!! * Yaml: **V-kasuma48**
:%{back%} V_48KASUMA/XX ;

LEXICON V_48KASUMA/XX
! (1) I teonimi:
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

! (2) II tegonimi: 
:%^StrGStem%>%{uü%} Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;
:%^StrGStem%>%{uü%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
:%^StrGStem%> GER_INE ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: 
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} PSS_IND_CONNEGII_dA ;

+Err/Dial:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: (1. and Neg, ConNegs.)
! Different from 2.
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ;
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

! 2nd person indicative present
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;

! 1st person plural present
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;

! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä: 
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
:%^WGStem%>v%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;
:%^WGStem%>v%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;

! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:%^WGStem%>v%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;

! (8) min 3. k tä:
:%^WGStem%>v ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ;

! (9) jus:
:%^WGStem%>%{uü%} ACT_JUS_guq ;

LEXICON V_48KUIOMA
!! There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
!! * Yaml: **V-kuioma48**
:%{back%} V_48KUIOMA/XX ;

LEXICON V_48KUIOMA/XX
! (1) I tegonimi:
! (2) II tegonimi:
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
 PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;!CHECKME

:%^VowRM%>õ%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:
 ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

:%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRT_12_i ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
:%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ;

 Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
:%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;
:%^StrGStem GER_INE ;

 Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
 ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

LEXICON V_48PALAMA
!! There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
!! * Yaml: **V-palama48**
:%{back%} V_48PALAMA/ELAEMAE ;

LEXICON V_48ELAEMAE
!! There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
!! * Yaml: ____
:%{front%} V_48PALAMA/ELAEMAE ;


LEXICON V_48PALAMA/ELAEMAE
! (1) I tegonimi: elämä sõgluma+V:sõ%{kg%}lu
:%^Pen%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

! (2) II tegonimi: elläq 
:%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem GER_INE ;

:%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_SG_NOM_v ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_OBL_v ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: elänüq
:%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: elet
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>%{eõ%} PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;!CHECKME

+Err/Orth:%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>%{eõ%} PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: elä
:%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

! 2nd person indicative present
:%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;

! 1st person plural present
:%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;

! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä: eläs
:%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: elli Sg1 and Pl3
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM	ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_ivAq ;

! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;

! (8) min 3. k tä: elli
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ;

! (9) jus:
:%^Pen%^WGStem ACT_JUS_guq ;


!LEXICON V_ELAEMAE !!≈ * __@CODE@__ elämä:elä
!!! * Yaml: __elaemae48__
!:%{front%} V_48PALAMA/ELAEMAE ;

LEXICON V_48SADAMA
!! There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
!! * Yaml: __V-sadama48__
:%{back%} V_48SADAMA/XX ;

LEXICON V_48SADAMA/XX
! (1) I tegonimi: sadama+V:sa%{tØ%}%{td%}a
:%^Pen%^G2 Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

! (2) II tegonimi:
:%^Pen%^G4 Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;
:%^Pen%^G4 GER_INE ;
 Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
:%^Pen%^G2 ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
 PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;!CHECKME

:%^VowRM%>%{aä%} PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
!! Pss_PrfPrc: sadat
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
:%^Pen%^G2 ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ;
:%^Pen%^G2 ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
:%^Pen%^G4%>%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
! (9) jus:

:%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
:%^Pen%^G2 ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

:%^G4%>%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT-1/2_ZERO ;

LEXICON V_49LWPMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** lõpma:lõpp
:%{back%} V_49LWPMA/XX ;
LEXICON V_49LWPMA/XX !!≈ * **@CODE@** lõpma:lõ%{pØ%}p
! (1) I tegonimi:
:%^CC2C Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

! (2) II tegonimi: 
:%^StrGStem%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;
:%^StrGStem GER_INE ;

:%^CC2C ACT_PRSPRC_vA ;


! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
:%^CC2C ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;!CHECKME

+Err/Dial:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ;
:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
! 2nd person indicative present
:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;
! 1st PL person indicative present
:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:


! (7) min 1. k maq:
:%^StrGStem%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;
+Err/Dial:%^StrGStem%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;


! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:%^StrGStem%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;

+Err/Dial:%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_iq ;

! (8) min 3. k tä:
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^StrGStem%>i K ;


! (9) jus:
!lõp

+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^WGStem%>%{eõ%}s K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^WGStem%>v%{aä%}q K ;

! lõpp


:%^WGStem ACT_JUS_kuq ;


LEXICON V_50TONISWMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** tonisõma:tonis
!! * Yaml: **toniswma50**
:%{back%} V_50TONISWMA/HELISEMAE ;
LEXICON V_50TONISWMA/HELISEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** tonisõma:tonis
! (1) I tegonimi:
! (2) II tegonimi:
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

 ACT_IND_PRT_12_i ;
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ;
:%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;

:%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_dA ;
:%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRT_ALL_di ;

:%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
 Harm_Neutr_INF_tAq ;
GER_INE_dEn ;

:%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
 ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
 PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
:%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
+Err/Dial:%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
 ACT_JUS_kuq ;

LEXICON V_50HELISEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** helisemä:helis
!! * Yaml: **helisemae50**
:%{front%} V_50TONISWMA/HELISEMAE ;


LEXICON V_51NWSWMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** nõsõma:nõs
!! * Yaml: **nwswma51**
!! cf. tulõma
:%{back%} V_51NWSWMA/PAESEMAE ;
LEXICON V_51PAESEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** päsemä:päs
!! * Yaml: **paesemae51**
!! cf. tulõma
:%{front%} V_51NWSWMA/PAESEMAE ;

LEXICON V_51NWSWMA/PAESEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** nõsõma:nõs
! (1) I tegonimi: nõsõma
:%^WGStem%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
:%^WGStem%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
:%^WGStem%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
:%^WGStem%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

! (2) II tegonimi: nõstaq
:%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_tAq ;
:%^WGStem GER_INE_tEn ;
 
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: nõsnuq
:%^WGStem ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: nõst
:%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_tU ;
:%^WGStem PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;!CHECKME

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: nõsõ
:%^WGStem%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;

! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä: nõsõs
:%^WGStem%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: nõssi
:%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRT_12_i ;
!:%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;

! (8) min 3. k tä: nõssi
:%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ;


LEXICON V_52ALOSTWLWMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** alostõlõma:alostõll
!! * Yaml: **alostwllwma52**
:%{back%} V_52ALOSTWLWMA/EHITELEMAE ;
LEXICON V_52EHITELEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** ehitelemä:ehitell
!! ehitelemä:ehitell
!! * Yaml: **ehitellemae52**
:%{front%} V_52ALOSTWLWMA/EHITELEMAE ;

LEXICON V_52ALOSTWLWMA/EHITELEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** alostõllõma:alostõ%{lØ%}l
! (1) I tegonimi: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^WGStem%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^StrGStem%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ; ! yaml 2023_03_05
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;

:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem ACT_JUS_guq ;

! (2) II tegonimi: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_Aq ; !2023_02_19
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise GER_INE ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: 
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: 
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_dX ;!2023_02_19

:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_d ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_dU-SG_NOM ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_dA ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;

! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä: 
! (7) min 1. k maq: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRT_12_i ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem ACT_IND_PRT_12_i ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem%>iq K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem%>iv%{aä%}q K ;!2023_02_19
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;

! (8) min 3. k tä: 
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ;


:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^WGStem%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;



LEXICON V_53KAEMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kaema:ka
:%{back%} V_53KAEMA/XX ;
LEXICON V_53JAEAEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
:%{front%} V_53XX/JAEAEMAE ;
LEXICON V_53XX/JAEAEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
! (1) I tegonimi:
! (2) II tegonimi:
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:

:%^VOWRaise PSS_PRSPRC_dAv ;
:%^VOWRaise PSS_PRFPRC_d ;
+Err/Dial:%^VOWRaise PSS_PRFPRC_dU-SG_NOM ;
:%^VOWRaise ACT_PRSPRC_vA ;
:%^VOWRaise Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
:%^VOWRaise ACT-PRFPRC-OBL_nU ;
:%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRS-SG1_ZERO ;
:%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t ;
+Err/Dial:%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_dEq ;
!+Err/Dial:%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_dEq ;
:%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_tiq ;
:%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
:%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

!:%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ;
:%^VOWRaise Harm_Neutr_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE-PSS_IND_PRT_di ; !!= * @CODE@ only 3rd person

 ACT-PRFPRC_nUq-SG_NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ jäänüq keenüq
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_sE ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;
 ACT-COND ;
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ;

:%^VOWRaise%^VowRM%>i V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ; !!= * @CODE@ jäi kii
:%^VowRM%>i V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NON-RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ; !!= * @CODE@ jäi kei
! CHECKME 2016-08-28
:%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) RAISED jääs jääseq 
! Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3

+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) joovaq sööväq
: ACT_JUS_guq ;
